Hawaii statutes.
[§195F-5] Forest stewardship
management plans; approved activities. (a) To participate in the forest
stewardship program, the applicant landowner shall prepare and submit to the
board a forest stewardship management plan that shall:

(1) Identify and describe activities to be undertaken
by the landowner to protect soil, water, aesthetic quality, recreation, timber,
water, fish, wildlife, and native plant resources on the land in a manner that
is compatible with the objectives of the program, is consistent with this
chapter, and qualifies under the board's list of approved activities;

(2) Be signed by all parties having an interest in or
holding any encumbrance upon the property, and shall state that the parties
agree to comply with the plan upon its approval; and

(3) Be approved by the board and available for public
review.

(b) The board and other cooperating natural
resource management agencies shall develop a list of approved management
activities and practices that shall be eligible for cost-share assistance under
the program in the following areas:

(1) Enhanced management and maintenance of vegetation
on vital watershed lands;

(2) Sustainable growth and management of forests for
timber and other forest products on lands from which all or most of the native
vegetation had been removed prior to January 1, 1991;

(3) Protection, restoration, and enhancement of
native plants and animals;

(4) Management, maintenance, and restoration of
forests for shelterbelts, windbreaks, aesthetic quality, and other conservation
purposes on lands from which all or most of the native vegetation had been
removed prior to January 1, 1991;

(5) Agroforestry management on lands from which all
or most of the native vegetation had been removed prior to January 1,
1991;

(6) Management and maintenance of native fish and
wildlife habitats;

(7) Management of outdoor recreational opportunities;
and

(8) Other activities approved by the board, which are
consistent with this chapter.

(c) The board shall encourage the use of private
agencies, consultants, organizations, and firms to the extent feasible for the
preparation of individual forest stewardship management plans and
implementation of approved activities. [L 1991, c 327, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next